Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
PART 1 COLORADO STUDENT LOANS
5-20-114. Administrative enforcement orders.

After notice and hearing, the administrator may order a student loan servicer or a person acting in the student loan servicer's behalf to cease and desist from engaging in violations of this part 1 or any rule lawfully adopted or order lawfully issued pursuant to this part 1. The order issued by the administrator may also require the student loan servicer or person to make refunds to persons of unlawful charges under this part 1 and an administrative penalty of up to one thousand five hundred dollars per violation, all or part of which may be specifically designated for consumer and creditor educational purposes.

A respondent aggrieved by an order of the administrator may obtain judicial review of the order in the Colorado court of appeals. The administrator may obtain an order of the court for enforcement of the administrator's order in the district court under section 24-4-106. All proceedings under this section are governed by sections 24-4-105 and 24-4-106.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added, (SB 19-002), ch. 157, p. 1871, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-057), ch. 378, p. 2533, § 12, effective June 29.

5-20-115. Assurance of discontinuance.

If it is claimed that a person has violated this part 1, the administrator may accept an assurance in writing that the person will not engage in the conduct in the future. The assurance may also require the person to make refunds to persons of unlawful charges under this part 1, pay a penalty authorized in section 5-20-114 (1), all or part of which may be specifically designated for consumer and creditor educational purposes, and reimburse the administrator for the administrator's reasonable costs incurred in investigating the conduct. If a person giving an assurance of discontinuance fails to comply with its terms, the assurance is evidence that prior to the assurance the person engaged in the conduct described in the assurance.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added, (SB 19-002), ch. 157, p. 1871, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-057), ch. 378, p. 2533, § 13, effective June 29.

5-20-116. Injunctions.

The administrator may bring a civil action to restrain a person from violating this part 1 or rules promulgated pursuant to this part 1 and for other appropriate relief, including such orders or judgments as may be necessary to completely compensate or restore any person affected by the violation to the person's original position. The administrator may also apply for a temporary restraining order or a preliminary injunction against a respondent pending final determination of proceedings. No bond or other security is required of the administrator before relief under this section may be granted.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added, (SB 19-002), ch. 157, p. 1871, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-057), ch. 378, p. 2533, § 14, effective June 29.

5-20-117. Civil actions by the administrator.

The administrator may bring a civil action against a student loan servicer for any violation of this part 1. An action may relate to transactions with more than one person. The court may order a student loan servicer to refund to a person any charges collected in violation of this part 1 and may also assess civil penalties against the student loan servicer as set forth in section 5-20-112 (2). If the administrator prevails in an action brought under this section, the administrator may recover reasonable costs in investigating and bringing the action and may recover reasonable attorney fees.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added, (SB 19-002), ch. 157, p. 1872, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-057), ch. 378, p. 2534, § 15, effective June 29.

5-20-118. Limitations.

Notwithstanding article 80 of title 13, all actions brought under this part 1 must be commenced within four years after the date on which any violation of this part 1 occurred or the date on which the last in a series of such acts or practices occurred or within four years after the plaintiff discovered or in the exercise of reasonable diligence should have discovered the occurrence of a violation of this part 1; except that the period of limitation provided in this section may be extended for a period of one year if the plaintiff proves that failure to timely commence the action was caused by the defendant engaging in conduct calculated to induce the plaintiff to refrain from or postpone the commencement of the action.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added, (SB 19-002), ch. 157, p. 1872, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-057), ch. 378, p. 2534, § 16, effective June 29.

5-20-119. Confidential information.

The administrator shall not make public the name or identity of a person whose acts or conduct the administrator investigates or examines pursuant to this part 1 or the facts disclosed in the investigation or examination.

The administrator may disclose license application and renewal records provided to the administrator and other contents of license records maintained pursuant to this part 1, but the administrator shall not make public the confidential information contained in the records.

The restrictions on the disclosure of information in subsections (1) and (2) of this section do not apply to disclosures by the administrator in actions or administrative enforcement proceedings pursuant to this part 1.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added, (SB 19-002), ch. 157, p. 1872, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-057), ch. 378, p. 2534, § 17, effective June 29.